Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.150

Disposition of fees—Grants to local governments.

(1) All fees paid under this chapter shall be credited by the state treasurer to the reclamation account established by chapter 89.16 RCW. Subject to legislative appropriation, the fees collected under this chapter shall be allocated and expended by the director for the administration of the well construction, well operators' licensing, and education programs.

(2) The department shall provide grants to local governing entities that have been delegated portions of the well construction program pursuant to RCW 18.104.043 to assist in supporting well inspectors hired by the local governing body. Grants provided to a local governing body shall not exceed the revenues generated from fees for the portion of the program delegated and from the area in which authority is delegated to the local governing body.

[ 1993 c 387 s 20; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 15.]